Utah statutes.
58-55-301.   License required -- License classifications.
(1) (a)  A person engaged in the construction trades licensed under this
chapter, as a contractor regulated under this chapter, as an alarm business or
company, or as an alarm company agent, shall become licensed under this
chapter before engaging in that trade or contracting activity in this state
unless specifically exempted from licensure under Section 58-1-307 or
58-55-305.
(b)  The license issued under this chapter and the business license issued by
the local jurisdiction in which the licensee has its principal place of
business shall be the only licenses required for the licensee to engage in a
trade licensed by this chapter, within the state.
(c)  Neither the state nor any of its political subdivisions may require of a
licensee any additional business licenses, registrations, certifications,
contributions, donations, or anything else established for the purpose of
qualifying a licensee under this chapter to do business in that local
jurisdiction, except for contract prequalification procedures required by
state agencies, or the payment of any fee for the license, registration, or
certification established as a condition to do business in that local
jurisdiction.
(2)  The division shall issue licenses under this chapter to qualified persons
in the following classifications:
(a)  general engineering contractor;
(b)  general building contractor;
(c)  residential and small commercial contractor;
(d)  specialty contractor;
(e)  master plumber;
(f)  residential master plumber;
(g)  journeyman plumber;
(h)  apprentice plumber;
(i)  residential journeyman plumber;
(j)  master electrician;
(k)  residential master electrician;
(l)  journeyman electrician;
(m)  residential journeyman electrician;
(n)  apprentice electrician;
(o)  construction trades instructor:
(i)  general engineering classification;
(ii)  general building classification;
(iii)  electrical classification;
(iv)  plumbing classification; and
(v)  mechanical classification;
(p)  alarm company; and
(q)  alarm company agent.
(3) (a)  An applicant may apply for a license in one or more classification or
specialty contractor subclassification.
(b)  A license shall be granted in each classification or subclassification
for which the applicant qualifies.
(c)  A separate application and fee must be submitted for each license
classification or subclassification.
